California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(b) The unencumbered balance of all local funds programmed for the completion of the BART Livermore extension shall be transferred to the authority and be considered resources available to effectuate the authority’s purposes pursuant to this chapter, except that local funds controlled by the San Joaquin Regional Rail Commission that have otherwise been identified for connectivity shall continue to be programmed and allocated by the San Joaquin Regional Rail Commission pursuant to measures approved by the voters of
 San Joaquin County pursuant to Division 19 (commencing with Section 180000).

(c) The authority is eligible to apply for and receive state and federal funds to perform its duties pursuant to this chapter.

(d) The authority may pursue any and all sources of funding
 to achieve connectivity except that the authority shall not apply for funds available under the Transportation Development Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 99200) of Part 11 of Division 10) for which any member entity of the authority may also be an applicant or for which any member entity of the authority is charged with approving applications for funding under that act, without the express written consent of that affected member entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 747, Sec. 3.   (AB 758)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

132659.

(a) The authority may enter into agreements with the Bay Area Rapid Transit District, the San Joaquin Regional Rail Commission, or any other entity to address any and all issues necessary to achieve transit connectivity, consistent with the project feasibility report’s findings, conclusions, and recommendations adopted pursuant to Section 132661.

(b) If the project feasibility report includes a recommendation for an extension of BART’s rapid transit system, the governing board of the Bay Area Rapid Transit District shall have the authority to approve or deny the recommendation.

(c) If the project feasibility report includes a recommendation for an extension of the Altamont
 Corridor Express commuter rail service, the governing board of the San Joaquin Regional Rail Commission shall have the authority to approve or deny the recommendation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 747, Sec. 3.   (AB 758)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

132660.

The authority and any entity contracted with to serve as the operator of any transit connectivity developed and delivered pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to all of the following:

(a) The Meyers-Milias-Brown Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(b) The California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(c) The Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 409.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

132661.

(a) On or before July 1, 2019, the authority shall provide a project feasibility report to the public, to be posted on the authority’s internet website, on the plans for the development and implementation of transit connectivity. The report, at a minimum, shall include the following elements:

(1) Recommendations for expediting the development of cost-effective and responsive transit connectivity between BART’s rapid transit system and the Altamont Corridor Express commuter rail service.

(2) The identification of a preferred entity or entities to deliver transit connectivity, including the role each entity will play in planning,
 designing, financing, constructing, operating, maintaining, and the leasing, developing, or disposing of land, facilities, or equipment, necessary to deliver and operate transit connectivity.

(3) A funding plan describing any grants, loans, allocations, fund transfers, or awards of local, regional, state, federal, or private funds that are proposed to be made available for achieving transit connectivity.

(4) A description of any plan to finance the development of transit connectivity, including a description of any revenue source or sources to be pledged for financing, the duration of time to complete the financing, and the estimated total cost of financing.

(5) A proposed schedule for the completion of transit connectivity.

(6) A preliminary design for the project or projects to complete transit connectivity, including the identification of right-of-way, routes, stations, equipment, and any other facilities necessary to achieve transit connectivity.

(b) The authority may use any relevant environmental review documents previously completed by the Bay Area Rapid Transit District or the San Joaquin Regional Rail Commission to prepare the report specified in subdivision (a).

(c) Upon completion and approval by the authority of the project feasibility report required under subdivision (a), the authority shall submit the report to the Metropolitan Transportation Commission, the governing board of the Bay Area Rapid Transit District, the governing
 board of the San Joaquin Regional Rail Commission, the policy committees of each house of the Legislature with jurisdiction over transportation policy matters, and the Transportation Agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 220, Sec. 2.   (SB 548)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12.8. IMPERIAL COUNTY TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION [132800. - 132824.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Creation of Commission [132800. - 132801.]

132800.

There is hereby created the Imperial County Transportation Commission. The commission shall be the successor agency to the Imperial Valley Association of Governments and shall assume all assets and liabilities of that entity. The area of jurisdiction of the commission shall consist of all of the incorporated and unincorporated area of Imperial County.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 56, Sec. 1.   (SB 607)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

132801.

(a) The governing board of the commission shall consist of the following members:

(1) Two members of the Imperial County Board of Supervisors. The term of a member under this paragraph terminates when he or she ceases to hold that office or when replaced by the board of supervisors.

(2) One member from each incorporated city within Imperial County who shall be the mayor of the city or a member of its city council. The term of a member under this paragraph terminates when he or she ceases to hold that office or when replaced by the city council.

(3) One member of the board of directors of the Imperial Irrigation
 District. The term of a member under this paragraph terminates when he or she ceases to hold that office or when replaced by the board of directors of the district.

(4) One nonvoting member appointed by the Governor
 representing the Department of Transportation.

(b) The governing board of the commission may also include the following nonvoting members:

(1) One member representing the State of Baja California, Mexico, who may be appointed by the governor of the state.

(2) One member representing the municipality of Mexicali, Mexico, who may be the mayor or his or her designee. 

(3) One member representing the Consul of Mexico in Calexico, California, who may be the consul or his or her designee.

(4) One member representing any federally recognized Native American tribe in Imperial County.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 56, Sec. 1.   (SB 607)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Administration [132810. - 132816.]

132810.

The governing board of the commission at its first meeting, and thereafter annually at the first meeting in January, shall elect a chairperson from its members who shall preside at all meetings, and a vice chairperson who shall preside in his or her absence. In the event of their absence or inability to act, the members present, by an order entered in the minutes, shall select one of their members to act as chairperson pro tempore, who, while so acting shall have all of the authority of the chairperson.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 56, Sec. 1.   (SB 607)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

132811.

The board shall establish rules for its proceedings consistent with the law of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 56, Sec. 1.   (SB 607)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

132812.

A majority of the voting members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and all official acts of the commission. All official acts of the board require the affirmative vote of the majority of the voting members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 56, Sec. 1.   (SB 607)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

132813.

The acts of the board shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 56, Sec. 1.   (SB 607)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

132814.

(a) All meetings of the board shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(b) All meetings of committees established by the board shall be held pursuant to Section 54952.3 of the Government Code, and no other provision of the Ralph M. Brown Act shall apply to meetings of those committees.

(c) Any committee of the board shall have a membership of at least three voting members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 56, Sec. 1.   (SB 607)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

132815.

The board shall do the following:

(a) Adopt an annual budget and fix the compensation of its officers and employees.

(b) Adopt an administrative code, by ordinance, which shall prescribe the powers and duties of commission officers, the method of appointment of commission employees, and methods, procedures, and systems of operation and management of the commission.

(c) Cause a postaudit of the financial transactions and records of the commission to be made at least annually by a certified public accountant.

(d) Appoint a technical advisory committee of representatives
 from all of the transit operators in the county, all of the incorporated cities in the county, the county, and the Department of Transportation.

(e) Appoint such other advisory committees the board deems necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 56, Sec. 1.   (SB 607)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

132816.

Notice of time and place of the public hearing for the adoption of the annual budget shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, and shall be published not later than the 15th day prior to the date of the hearing. The proposed annual budget shall be available for public inspection at least 15 days prior to the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 56, Sec. 1.   (SB 607)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Powers and Functions [132820. - 132824.]

132820.

The commission may do any of the following:

(a) Use up to 3 percent of the revenues in the local transportation fund for purposes of carrying out its transportation planning and programming responsibilities.

(b) Sue and be sued.

(c) Enter into contracts with qualified vendors to further the purposes of the commission.

(d) Do any and all things necessary to carry out the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 11, Sec. 1.   (AB 335)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

132822.

(a) The commission, in cooperation with local agencies that elect to participate, may, within the boundaries of the County of Imperial, assist those agencies in the coordination, administration, and implementation of programs and policies.

(b) (1) The commission may evaluate, develop, and implement nontransportation programs that it determines would provide local benefits by consolidating and sharing costs and resources, by facilitating local agency cooperation, or by operating under the commission’s management. These nontransportation programs include
 providing animal control services, waste management services, emergency response services, and multiagency communication services during countywide natural disasters such as earthquakes, fires, and floods.

(2) The commission may develop or implement a nontransportation program only upon a majority vote of, and the adoption of a resolution by, the commission’s board.

(c) Consistent with this section, the commission may function as a regional agency for purposes of Article 3 (commencing with Section 40970) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 30 of the Public Resources Code.

(d) Consistent with this section, the commission, upon adoption of a resolution by its board, may function as the service authority for
 freeway emergencies for the County of Imperial pursuant to Section 2551 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(e) The commission may apply for, and receive, moneys and grants available to carry out its functions.

(f) (1) The commission shall not use transportation moneys for nontransportation purposes.

(2) Revenues from the County of Imperial sales tax extended pursuant to local Measure D, which was approved by voters at the November 4, 2008, statewide general election, shall not be used for purposes of this section.

(g) For purposes of this section, “local agency” means a county, city, whether general law or chartered, city and county, town, municipal
 corporation, district, political subdivision, or any board, commission, or agency thereof, or other local public agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 11, Sec. 2.   (AB 335)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

132824.

The commission shall undertake the following:

(a) Prepare a short-range transportation plan that includes the development and approval of a three- to five-year transportation improvement program, as follows:

(1) The transportation improvement program shall apply to all projects funded with federal, state, and local funds.

(2) The transportation improvement program shall be developed in coordination and consultation with
 the multicounty designated transportation planning agency, and shall be consistent with that agency’s regional transportation plan.

(3) The county commission and the multicounty designated transportation planning agency shall enter into a memorandum of understanding specifying the process for preparing the transportation improvement program.

(4) The commission shall consult with its member agencies, the Department of Transportation, adjacent counties, and other entities public and private when preparing its short-range plan and transportation improvement program.

(b) The commission shall be responsible for administering the funds deposited in the local transportation fund according to the terms and conditions of the Mills-Alquist-Deddeh Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 99200) of Part 11 of Division 10), which
 is also known as the Transportation Development Act, or any successor to that act.

(c) The commission shall be responsible for preparing the short-range transit plan required by the Transportation Development Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 56, Sec. 1.   (SB 607)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 13.1. SANTA CLARA COUNTY TRAFFIC AUTHORITY [140280. - 140280.]

140280.

(a) The repeal of Division 13 (commencing with Section 140000), and the termination of the Santa Clara County Traffic Authority, do not impair either the validity of any transactions and use tax imposed by the authority prior to its termination, or the power or obligation of the State Board of Equalization to administer the collection of the tax, including audits and prosecutions related to the tax. Upon notice to the State Board of Equalization, given in accordance to the notice procedures specified in the Agreement for the State Administration of District Transactions and Use Taxes executed between the Santa Clara County Traffic Authority and the board, the authority may assign and sell to another legal entity the right to receive the revenue derived from the tax and determined by the State Board of Equalization to be available for transmittal. The State Board of Equalization shall be bound by that assignment upon the required notice. If the authority does not assign the right to receive the revenue derived from the tax, the revenue shall be transmitted to the Santa Clara County Transit District. All revenue transmitted to the Santa Clara County Transit District pursuant to this section shall be expended solely for purposes authorized by Division 13 (commencing with Section 140000) prior to the repeal of that division. The right to receive the assigned revenues shall be limited to the receipt thereof, and shall not extend to any audit privileges or access to confidential information of the State Board of Equalization.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 57450) of Part 5 of Division 3 of Title 5 of the Government Code, upon termination of the Santa Clara County Traffic Authority, the Santa Clara County Transit District shall be the successor for purposes of winding up the affairs of the traffic authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 791, Sec. 1.   Effective September 24, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14. COACHELLA VALLEY INTERMODAL TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY [141000. - 141050.]

141000.

For purposes of this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) The “authority” is the Coachella Valley Intermodal Transportation Authority and its 11 districts created under this division.

(b) The “board” is the board of directors of the authority, appointed under Section 141010.

(c) The “district” may be any of the following:

(1) The incorporated boundary of any one of the Coachella Valley members of the Coachella Valley Association of Governments.

(2) The unincorporated area of Riverside County within the Coachella Valley.

(3) The incorporated boundary of the City of Blythe.

(d) The “district board” is the legislative body of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 486, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

141005.

The Coachella Valley Intermodal Transportation Authority is hereby created to serve as the governing agency for its 11 separate districts, recognized in that capacity by the Coachella Valley Association of Governments, the Riverside County Transportation Commission, and the United States Department of Transportation, for the following purposes:

(a) Serving as the primary authority for managing and operating intermodal passenger transportation and related infrastructure.

(b) Serving as the primary authority for intermodal less-than-carload freight transportation and related infrastructure within the Coachella Valley and eastern Riverside County.

(c) Serving as the primary authority for facilities and services and related infrastructure.

(d) Establishing, maintaining, and operating an independent political and administrative structure by which to implement passenger and freight transportation initiatives.

(e) Completing planning and environmental studies to ascertain project feasibility.

(f) Being available for designation as the lead agency for purposes of environmental review, entitlement permitting, and public participation.

(g) Acquiring, by grant, purchase, condemnation, gift, devise, or lease, and holding, using, selling, leasing or disposing of, any real and personal property necessary for the full exercise, or convenient or useful for the carrying on of, any of the authority’s powers.

(h) Fixing rates, parking fees, charges, or rents for the use of any facilities acquired, constructed, operated, or maintained by the authority or any of its districts, and modifying the same at its pleasure, subject to any contractual obligation that may be entered into by the authority with respect to the fixing of those rates, fees, charges, or rents.

(i) Obtaining funds for, and sustaining the planning, development, maintenance, and operation of, the Coachella Valley and City of Blythe Intermodal Transportation Center.

(j) Accepting gifts, subventions, grants, rebates, and subsidies from any source.

(k) Entering into indentures.

(l) Issuing tax-exempt revenue bonds and coupons.

(m) Spending moneys and incurring indebtedness to fulfill its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 486, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

141010.

(a) The authority shall be governed by the Executive Committee of the Coachella Valley Association of Governments.

(b) A district shall be governed by the elected legislative body of that particular political entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 486, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

141015.

The board and all district boards shall do all of the following:

(a) Elect a chairperson, vice chairperson, and secretary.

(b) Supervise and regulate all facilities owned by, and all operations of, the authority or the district, whichever is applicable.

(c) Enter into contracts necessary for the full exercise of the power of the authority or district.

(d) Conduct an annual audit of all accounts of the authority or district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 486, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

141020.

All meetings of the board or the district boards shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 486, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

141025.

No officer or employee of the authority or any district shall in any manner be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract awarded, or to be awarded by, the board or district boards, or in the profits to be derived therefrom contrary to the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090) of Chapter 1 of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 486, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

141040.

(a) The authority or any of the districts, either in conjunction with the authority or any other of the districts or individually, may issue general and special revenue bonds for the acquisition, construction, or completion of any works, equipment, materials, supplies, properties, or structures necessary or convenient to carry out the objects and purposes of this division.

(b) The total amount of bonds outstanding shall not be in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) at any one time per district.

(c) Each separate improvement shall be designated as a “project” and the purpose, nature, and extent thereof shall be described in general terms prior to the issuance of any bonds.

(d) The validity of the authorization and issuance of any revenue bonds by the authority or the districts is not dependent on nor affected in any way by any of the following:

(1) Proceedings taken by the authority or the districts for the acquisition, construction, or completion of any improvement or any part thereof.

(2) Any contracts made by the authority or the districts for the acquisition, construction, or completion of any improvements.

(3) The failure to complete any improvements for which bonds are authorized to be issued.

(e) The authority or any district shall issue revenue bonds in its name only. These bonds shall constitute obligations of the authority or district only, and neither the payment of principal or interest of any bond constitutes a debt, liability, or obligation of the State of California. The authority or district shall determine the time, form, and manner of the issuance of revenue bonds.

(f) The authority or the districts may enter into indentures providing the aggregate principal amount, date or dates, maturities, interest rate, denomination, form, registration transfer, and interchange of the bonds and coupons and the terms and conditions upon which the bonds and coupons shall be executed, issued, secured, sold, paid, redeemed, funded, and refunded. Reference to this division shall be made on the face of the bonds to those indentures by its date of adoption, or the apparent date, on the face thereof and into the body of these bonds and their appurtenant coupons. Each taker and subsequent holder of these bonds or coupons, whether the coupons are attached or detached from the bonds, has recourse to all of the provisions of the indenture and of this division, and is bound thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 486, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

141045.

(a) The authority may acquire, construct, own, operate, control, or use right-of-way, rail lines, bus lines, stations, platforms, switches, yards, terminals, and any and all other facilities, equipment, and infrastructure necessary and convenient to provide intermodal transportation services, together with all physical structures necessary or convenient for the access of persons and vehicles thereto.

(b) The authority or districts may acquire any interest in, or rights to, the joint use of any or all of the things listed in subdivision (a). However, installations in any street, road, or other property devoted to a public use shall be subject to consent of the governing body in charge of that public use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 486, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

141050.

The authority or the districts shall not interfere with, or exercise any control over, any transit facilities now or hereafter owned and operated wholly or partially within the district by any city or public agency, unless by consent of the city or public agency, and upon any terms that are mutually agreed upon between the board and the city or public agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 486, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 15. FRESNO COUNTY TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY [142000. - 142277.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [142000. - 142010.]

142000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Fresno County Transportation Improvement Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142001.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) In Fresno County, regional transportation improvements and local transportation improvements and services are an immediate high priority needed to resolve the county’s transportation problems that threaten the economic viability and development potential of the county and adversely impact the quality of life therein.

(b) In order to deal in an expeditious manner with current and future transportation problems, the county needs to develop and implement a local funding program that goes significantly beyond current federal and state funding which is inadequate to resolve these problems.

(c) It is in the public interest to allow the voters of Fresno County to continue the Fresno County Transportation Authority so that local transportation decisions can be implemented in a timely manner to provide regional transportation improvements and to meet local transportation needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 474, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142002.

It is the intent of the Legislature that funds generated pursuant to this division not replace property tax revenues which would otherwise be expended for roads and transportation purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142003.

This division shall be liberally construed in order to effectuate its purposes. No inadvertent error, irregularity, informality, or the inadvertent neglect or omission of any officer, in any procedure taken under this division, other than fraud, shall void or invalidate that proceeding or any levy imposed to finance highway improvements or local transportation needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142004.

“Authority” means the Fresno County Transportation Authority created pursuant to this division in the County of Fresno.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142005.

“Board of supervisors” means the Fresno County Board of Supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142006.

“County” means the County of Fresno.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142007.

“Fresno-Clovis Metropolitan Area” means that area within the adopted spheres of influence of the Cities of Fresno and Clovis, as approved and amended by the local agency formation commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142008.

“Transportation planning agency” means the Council of Fresno County Governments or any other agency which may be designated by the Governor as responsible for regional transportation planning within the county to comply with federal and state requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142010.

The authority is terminated two years from the last day on which the transactions and use tax authorized by this division is collected and as of that date this division is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Division 15, comprising Sections 142000 to 142277.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Creation Of The Authority [142050. - 142052.]

142050.

The Fresno County Transportation Authority is hereby continued in the county, as originally created by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 474, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142051.

The authority shall consist of nine members selected as follows:

(a) Two members of the board of supervisors appointed by the board, consisting of one member from rural district 1, 4, or 5 and one member from urban district 2 or 3.

(b) Two members representing the City of Fresno, consisting of the mayor thereof and a member of the city council of that city appointed by the city council.

(c) One member representing the City of Clovis appointed by the city council of that city.

(d) Two members representing the other cities within the county, consisting of one westside member appointed by a committee comprised of the mayors of each of those cities west of State Highway Route 99, and one eastside member appointed by a committee comprised of the mayors of each of those cities east of State Highway Route 99.

(e) Two members of the public at large, consisting of one member appointed by the board of supervisors with the appointee residing outside of the incorporated areas of Fresno and Clovis, and one member appointed jointly by the city councils of Fresno and Clovis with the appointee residing within the incorporated area of Fresno or Clovis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 248, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142052.

(a) Except for the Mayor of the City of Fresno, the members of the authority shall serve for a term of two years.

(b) If any member other than the public member ceases to be an elected official, that member shall cease to be a member of the authority, and another member shall be appointed for the remainder of the term pursuant to Section 142051.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 474, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Administration [142100. - 142109.]

142100.

The authority, at its first meeting, and thereafter annually at the first meeting in January, shall elect a chairperson who shall preside at all meetings, and a vice chairperson who shall preside in his or her absence. In the event of their absence or inability to act, the members present, by an order entered into the minutes, shall select one of their members to act as chairperson pro tempore, who, while so acting, shall have all the authority of the chairperson.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142101.

The authority shall adopt rules for its proceedings consistent with the law of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142102.

A majority of the members of the authority constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business, and all official acts of the authority require the affirmative vote of the majority of the members of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142103.

The acts of the authority shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142104.

All meetings of the authority shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142105.

The authority shall do all the following:

(a) Adopt an annual budget.

(b) Adopt an administrative code, by ordinance, which prescribes the powers and duties of the authority officers, the method of appointment of the authority employees, and methods, procedures, and systems of operations and management of the authority.

(c) Cause a postaudit of the financial transactions and records of the authority to be made at least annually by a certified public accountant.

(d) Appoint a policy advisory committee composed of one representative of each city in the county and one representative of the county. Each representative on the committee shall be an elected official. If a representative ceases to be an elected official, that representative shall cease to be a member of the committee, and another representative from that city or county, as the case may be, shall be appointed. No person shall serve on the authority and on the committee at the same time.

(e) Establish a citizens oversight committee with membership, method of appointment, roles, and responsibilities in accordance with and as defined in the initial expenditure plan prepared for the purposes of the extension of the retail transactions and use tax.

(f) Do any and all things necessary to carry out the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 248, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142106.

The authority may hire an independent staff of its own or contract with any department or agency of the United States or with any public agency to implement this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142107.

The authority shall fix the compensation of its officers and employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142108.

(a) Notice of the time and place of a public hearing on the adoption of the annual budget shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code not later than the 15th day prior to the day of the hearing.

(b) The proposed annual budget shall be available for public inspection at least 15 days prior to the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142109.

(a) The authority shall rely, to the extent possible, on existing state, regional, and local transportation planning and programming data and expertise, rather than on a large duplicative staff and set of plans.

(b) The authority shall not expend more than 1 percent of the funds generated pursuant to this division in any year for salary and benefits of its staff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Powers and Functions [142150. - 142155.]

142150.

The authority may adopt a seal and alter it at its pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142151.

The authority may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   Effective July 14, 1986.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 142010.)
-------------------------------------------

142152.

All claims for money or damages against the authority are governed by Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code, except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.
